de: Verdacht auf krebserzeugende Wirkung, R40
en: Limited evidence of a carcinogenic effect, R40
cs: Podezření na karcinogenní účinky, R40
dk: Mulighed for kræftfremkaldende effekt, R40
el: Ύποπτο καρκινογένεσης, R40
es: Posibles efectos cancerígenos, R40
et: Võimalik vähktõve põhjustaja, R40
fi: Epäillään aiheuttavan syöpäsairauden vaaraa, R40
fr: Effet cacérogène suspectè - preuves insuffisantes, R40
hu: A rákkeltő hatás korlátozott mértékben bizonyított, R40
it: Possibilità di effetti cancerogeni - prove insufficienti, R40
lt: Įtariama\, kad gali sukelti vėžį, R40
lv: Kancerogenitāte ir daļēji pierādīta, R40
mt: Possibilità\, mhix għal kollox ippruvata\, ta` effetti kanċeroġeni, R40
nl: Carcinogene effecten zijn niet uitgesloten, R40
no: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning, R40
pl: Ograniczone dowody działania rakotwórczego, R40
pt: Possibilidade de efeitos cancerígenos, R40
sk: Možnost’ karcinogénneho účinku, R40
sl: Možen rakotvoren učinek, R40
sv: Misstänks kunna ge cancer, R40

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen, R40/20
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects through inhalation, R40/20
cs: R40/20
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved indånding, R40/20
el: R40/20
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles por inhalación, R40/20
et: R40/20
fi: Terveydelle haitallista\, pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä, R40/20
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par inhalation, R40/20
hu: R40/20
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili per inalazione, R40/20
lt: R40/20
lv: R40/20
mt: R40/20
nl: Schadelijk: bij inademing zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R40/20
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding, R40/20
pl: R40/20
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis por inalação, R40/20
sk: R40/20
sl: R40/20
sv: Farligt\, risk för bestående skador vid inandning, R40/20

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen und bei Berührung mit der Haut, R40/20/21
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects through inhalation and in contact with skin, R40/20/21
cs: R40/20/21
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved indånding og hudkontakt, R40/20/21
el: R40/20/21
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles por inhalación y contacto con la piel, R40/20/21
et: R40/20/21
fi: Terveydelle haitallista\, pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä ja joutuessaan iholle, R40/20/21
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par inhalation et par contact avec la peau, R40/20/21
hu: R40/20/21
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili per inalazione e a contatto con la pelle, R40/20/21
lt: R40/20/21
lv: R40/20/21
mt: R40/20/21
nl: Schadelijk: bij inademing en aanraking met de huid zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R40/20/21
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding og hudkontakt, R40/20/21
pl: R40/20/21
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis por inalação e em contacto com a pele, R40/20/21
sk: R40/20/21
sl: R40/20/21
sv: Farligt\, risk för bestående skador. vid inandning och vid hudkontakt, R40/20/21

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen\, Berührung mit der Haut und durch Verschlucken, R40/20/21/22
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects through inhalation\, in contact with skin and if swallowed, R40/20/21/22
cs: R40/20/21/22
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved indånding\, hudkontakt og indtagelse, R40/20/21/22
el: R40/20/21/22
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles por inhalación\, contacto con la piel e ingestión, R40/20/21/22
et: R40/20/21/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista\, pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä\, joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R40/20/21/22
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par inhalation\, par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R40/20/21/22
hu: R40/20/21/22
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili per inalazione\, a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R40/20/21/22
lt: R40/20/21/22
lv: R40/20/21/22
mt: R40/20/21/22
nl: Schadelijk: bij inademing\, aanraking met de huid en opname door de mond zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R40/20/21/22
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding\, hudkontakt og svelging, R40/20/21/22
pl: R40/20/21/22
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis por inalação\, em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R40/20/21/22
sk: R40/20/21/22
sl: R40/20/21/22
sv: Farligt\, risk för bestående skador vid inandning\, vid hudkontakt och vid förtäring, R40/20/21/22

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens durch Einatmen und durch Verschlucken, R40/20/22
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects through inhalation and if swallowed, R40/20/22
cs: R40/20/22
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved indånding og indtagelse, R40/20/22
el: R40/20/22
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles por inhalación e ingestión, R40/20/22
et: R40/20/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista\, pysyvien vaurioiden vaara hengitettynä ja nieltynä, R40/20/22
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par inhalation et par ingestion, R40/20/22
hu: R40/20/22
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili per inalazione e ingestione, R40/20/22
lt: R40/20/22
lv: R40/20/22
mt: R40/20/22
nl: Schadelijk: bij inademing en opname door de mond zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R40/20/22
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved innånding og svelging, R40/20/22
pl: R40/20/22
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis por inalação e ingestão, R40/20/22
sk: R40/20/22
sl: R40/20/22
sv: Farligt\, risk för bestående skador vid inandning och vid förtäring, R40/20/22

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens bei Berührung mit der Haut, R40/21
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects in contact with skin, R40/21
cs: R40/21
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved hudkontakt, R40/21
el: R40/21
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles en contacto con la piel, R40/21
et: R40/21
fi: Terveydelle haitallista\, pysyvien vaurioiden vaara joutuessaan iholle, R40/21
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par contact avec la peau, R40/21
hu: R40/21
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili a contatto con la pelle, R40/21
lt: R40/21
lv: R40/21
mt: R40/21
nl: Schadelijk: bij aanraking met de huid zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R40/21
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved hudkontakt, R40/21
pl: R40/21
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis em contacto com a pele, R40/21
sk: R40/21
sl: R40/21
sv: Farligt\, risk för bestående skador vid hudkontakt, R40/21

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens bei Berührung mit der Haut und durch Verschlucken, R40/21/22
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects in contact with skin and if swallowed, R40/21/22
cs: R40/21/22
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved hudkontakt og indtagelse, R40/21/22
el: R40/21/22
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles en contacto con la piel e ingestión, R40/21/22
et: R40/21/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista\, pysyvien vaurioiden vaara joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R40/21/22
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R40/21/22
hu: R40/21/22
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R40/21/22
lt: R40/21/22
lv: R40/21/22
mt: R40/21/22
nl: Schadelijk: bij aanraking met de huid en opname door de mond zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R40/21/22
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved hudkontakt og svelging, R40/21/22
pl: R40/21/22
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R40/21/22
sk: R40/21/22
sl: R40/21/22
sv: Farligt\, risk för bestående skador vid hudkontakt och vid förtäring, R40/21/22

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Möglichkeit irreversiblen Schadens durch Verschlucken, R40/22
en: Harmful: possible risk of irreversible effects if swallowed, R40/22
cs: R40/22
dk: Farlig: mulighed for varig skade på helbred ved indtagelse, R40/22
el: R40/22
es: Nocivo: posibilidad de efectos irreversibles por ingestión, R40/22
et: R40/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista\, pysyvien vaurioiden vaara nieltynä, R40/22
fr: Nocif: possibilité d'effets irréversibles par ingestion, R40/22
hu: R40/22
it: Nocivo: possibilità di effetti irreversibili per ingestione, R40/22
lt: R40/22
lv: R40/22
mt: R40/22
nl: Schadelijk: bij opname door de mond zijn onherstelbare effecten niet uitgesloten, R40/22
no: Helseskadelig: Mulig fare for uhelbredelig skadevirkning ved svelging, R40/22
pl: R40/22
pt: Nocivo: possibilidade de efeitos irreversíveis por ingestão, R40/22
sk: R40/22
sl: R40/22
sv: Farligt\, risk för bestående skador vid förtäring, R40/22

de: Gefahr ernster Augenschäden, R41
en: Risk of serious damage to eyes, R41
cs: Nebezpečí vážného poškození očí, R41
dk: Risiko for alvorlig øjenskade, R41
el: Κίνδυνος σοβαρών οφθαλµικών βλαβών, R41
es: Riesgo de lesiones oculares graves, R41
et: Silmade kahjustamise tõsine oht, R41
fi: Vakavan silmävaurion vaara, R41
fr: Risque de lésions oculaires graves, R41
hu: Súlyos szemkárosodást okozhat, R41
it: Rischio di gravi lesioni oculari, R41
lt: Gali smarkiai pažeisti akis, R41
lv: Nopietnu bojājumu draudi acīm, R41
mt: Riskju ta' ħsara serja lill-għajnejn, R41
nl: Gevaar voor ernstig oogletsel, R41
no: Fare for alvorlig øyeskade, R41
pl: Ryzyko poważnego uszkodzenia oczu, R41
pt: Risco de lesões oculares graves, R41
sk: Riziko vážneho poškodenia očí, R41
sl: Nevarnost hudih poškodb oči, R41
sv: Risk för allvarliga ögonskador, R41

de: Sensibilisierung durch Einatmen möglich, R42
en: May cause sensitisation by inhalation, R42
cs: Může vyvolat senzibilizaci při vdechování, R42
dk: Kan give overfølsomhed ved indånding, R42
el: Μπορεί να προκαλέσει ευαισθητοποίηση όταν εισπνέεται, R42
es: Posibilidad de sensibilización por inhalación, R42
et: Sissehingamisel võib põhjustada ülitundlikkust, R42
fi: Altistuminen hengitysteitse voi aiheuttaa herkistymistä, R42
fr: Peut entraîner une sensibilisation par inhalation, R42
hu: Belélegezve túlérzékenységet okozhat (szenzibilizáló hatású lehet), R42
it: Può provocare sensibilizzazione per inalazione, R42
lt: Gali sukelti alergiją įkvėpus, R42
lv: Ieelpojot var izraisīt paaugstinātu jutīgumu, R42
mt: Jista' jġib sensitizzazzjoni meta jinxtamm, R42
nl: Kan overgevoeligheid veroorzaken bij inademing, R42
no: Fare for allergi ved innånding, R42
pl: Może powodować uczulenie w następstwie narażenia drogą oddechową, R42
pt: Pode causar sensibilização por inalação, R42
sk: Môže spôsobit’ senzibilizáciu pri vdýchnutí, R42
sl: Vdihavanje lahko povzroči preobčutljivost, R42
sv: Kan ge allergi vid inandning, R42

de: Sensibilisierung durch Einatmen und Hautkontakt möglich, R42/43
en: May cause sensitisation by inhalation and skin contact, R42/43
cs: Může vyvolat senzibilizaci při vdechování a při styku s kůží, R42/43
dk: Kan give overfølsomhed ved indånding og ved kontakt med huden, R42/43
el: Μπορεί να προκαλέσει ευαισθητοποίηση όταν εισπνέεται και σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R42/43
es: Posibilidad de sensibilización por inhalación y por contacto con la piel, R42/43
et: Võib põhjustada ülitundlikkust sissehingamisel ja kokkupuutel nahaga, R42/43
fi: Altistuminen hengitysteitse ja ihokosketus voi aiheuttaa herkistymistä, R42/43
fr: Peut entraîner une sensibilisation par inhalation et par contact avec la peau, R42/43
hu: Belélegezve és bőrrel érintkezve túlérzékenységet okozhat (szenzibilizáló hatású lehet), R42/43
it: Può provocare sensibilizzazione per inalazione e contatto con la pelle, R42/43
lt: Gali sukelti alergiją įkvėpus ir susilietus su oda, R42/43
lv: Saskaroties ar ādu vai ieelpojot\, var izraisīt paaugstinātu jutīgumu, R42/43
mt: Jista' jikkaġuna sensitizzazzjoni meta jinxtamm u meta jmiss ilġilda, R42/43
nl: Kan overgevoeligheid veroorzaken bij inademing of contact met de huid, R42/43
no: Fare for allergi ved innånding og hudkontakt, R42/43
pl: Może powodować uczulenie w następstwie narażenia drogą oddechową i w kontakcie ze skórą, R42/43
pt: Pode causar sensibilização por inalação e em contacto com a pele, R42/43
sk: Môže spôsobit’ senzibilizáciu po vdýchnutí a po kontakte s pokožkou, R42/43
sl: Lahko povzroči preobčutljivost pri vdihavanju in v stiku s kožo, R42/43
sv: Kan ge allergi vid inandning och hudkontakt, R42/43

de: Sensibilisierung durch Hautkontakt möglich, R43
en: May cause sensitisation by skin contact, R43
cs: Může vyvolat senzibilizaci při styku s kůží, R43
dk: Kan give overfølsomhed ved kontakt med huden, R43
el: Μπορεί να προκαλέσει ευαισθητοποίηση σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R43
es: Posibilidad de sensibilización en contacto con la piel, R43
et: Kokkupuutel nahaga võib põhjustada ülitundlikkust, R43
fi: Ihokosketus voi aiheuttaa herkistymistä, R43
fr: Peut entraîner une sensibilisation par contact avec la peau, R43
hu: Bőrrel érintkezve túlérzékenységet okozhat (szenzibilizáló hatású lehet), R43
it: Può provocare sensibilizzazione per contatto con la pelle, R43
lt: Gali sukelti alergiją susilietus su oda, R43
lv: Saskaroties ar ādu\, var izraisīt paaugstinātu jutīgumu, R43
mt: Jista' jikkaġuna sensitizzazzjoni meta jmiss il-ġilda, R43
nl: Kan overgevoeligheid veroorzaken bij contact met de huid, R43
no: Fare for allergi ved hudkontakt, R43
pl: Może powodować uczulenie w kontakcie ze skórą, R43
pt: Pode causar sensibilização em contacto com a pele, R43
sk: Môže spôsobit’ senzibilizáciu pri kontakte s pokožkou, R43
sl: Stik s kožo lahko povzroči preobčutljivost, R43
sv: Kan ge allergi vid hudkontakt, R43

de: Explosionsgefahr bei Erhitzen unter Einschluss, R44
en: Risk of explosion if heated under confinement, R44
cs: Nebezpečí výbuchu při zahřátí v uzavřeném obalu, R44
dk: Eksplosionsfarlig ved opvarmning under indeslutning, R44
el: Κίνδυνος εκρήξεως εάν θερµανθεί υπό περιορισµό, R44
es: Riesgo de explosión al calentarlo en ambiente confinado, R44
et: Plahvatusohtlik kuumutamisel kinnises mahutis, R44
fi: Räjähdysvaara kuumennettaessa suljetussa astiassa, R44
fr: Risque d'explosion si chauffé en ambiance confinée, R44
hu: Zárt térben hő hatására robbanhat, R44
it: Rischio di esplosione per riscaldamento in ambiente confinato, R44
lt: Gali sprogti\, jei kaitinama sandariai uždaryta, R44
lv: Sprādziena draudi\, karsējot slēgtā vidē, R44
mt: Riskju ta' splużjoni jekk jissaħħan fil-magħluq, R44
nl: Ontploffingsgevaar bij verwarming in afgesloten toestand, R44
no: Eksplosjonsfarlig ved oppvarming i lukket rom, R44
pl: Zagrożenie wybuchem po ogrzaniu w zamkniętym pojemniku, R44
pt: Risco de explosão se aquecido em ambiente fechado, R44
sk: Riziko výbuchu pri zahrievaní v uzavretom priestore, R44
sl: Nevarnost eksplozije ob segrevanju v zaprtem prostoru, R44
sv: Explosionsrisk vid uppvärmning i sluten behållare, R44

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Einatmen\, Berührung mit der Haut und durch Verschlucken, R48/20/21/22
en: Harmful: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure through inhalation\, in contact with skin and if swallowed, R48/20/21/22
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici vdechováním\, stykem s kůží a požíváním, R48/20/21/22
dk: Farlig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved indånding\, hudkontakt og indtagelse, R48/20/21/22
el: Επιβλαβές: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρα- τεταµένη έκθεση όταν εισπνέεται\, σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περί- πτωση καταπόσεως, R48/20/21/22
es: Nocivo: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por inhalación\, contacto con la piel e ingestión, R48/20/21/22
et: Kahjulik: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel sissehingamisel\, kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R48/20/21/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle hengitettynä\, joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R48/20/21/22
fr: Nocif: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par inhalation\, par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R48/20/21/22
hu: Hosszabb időn át belélegezve\, bőrrel érintkezve és szájon keresztül a szervezetbe jutva ártalmas: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/20/21/22
it: Nocivo: pericolo di gravi danni alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata per inalazione\, a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R48/20/21/22
lt: Kenksminga: ilgą laiką pakartotinai įkvepiant\, veikiant per odą ir praryjant sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/20/21/22
lv: Kaitīgs – iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas iedarbības ieelpojot\, norijot un nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R48/20/21/22
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni għat-tul minħabba xamm\, mess mal-ġilda jew jekk jinbela', R48/20/21/22
nl: Schadelijk: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij inademing\, aanraking met de huid en opname door de mond, R48/20/21/22
no: Helseskadelig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved innånding\, hudkontakt og svelging, R48/20/21/22
pl: Działa szkodliwie przez drogi oddechowe\, w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/20/21/22
pt: Nocivo: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada por inalação\, em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R48/20/21/22
sk: Škodlivý \, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou vdýchnutím\, pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R48/20/21/22
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega vdihavanja\, stika s kožo in zauživanja, R48/20/21/22
sv: Farligt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom inandning\, hudkontakt och förtäring, R48/20/21/22

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Einatmen und durch Verschlucken, R48/20/22
en: Harmful: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure through inhalation and if swallowed, R48/20/22
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici vdechováním a požíváním, R48/20/22
dk: Farlig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved indånding og indtagelse, R48/20/22
el: Επιβλαβές: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρα- τεταµένη έκθεση όταν εισπνέεται και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R48/20/22
es: Nocivo: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por inhalación e ingestión, R48/20/22
et: Kahjulik: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel sissehingamisel ja allaneelamisel, R48/20/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pitkäaikainen altitstus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle hengitettynä ja nieltynä, R48/20/22
fr: Nocif: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par inhalation et par ingestion, R48/20/22
hu: Hosszabb időn át belélegezve és szájon át a szervezetbe jutva ártalmas: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/20/22
it: Nocivo: pericolo di gravi danni alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata per inalazione e ingestione, R48/20/22
lt: Kenksminga: ilgą laiką pakartotinai įkvepiant ir praryjant sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/20/22
lv: Kaitīgs – ieelpojot un norijot iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas iedarbības, R48/20/22
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni għat-tul minħabba xamm u jekk jinbela', R48/20/22
nl: Schadelijk: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij inademing en opname door de mond, R48/20/22
no: Helseskadelig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved innånding og svelging, R48/20/22
pl: Działa szkodliwie przez drogi oddechowe i po połknięciu; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/20/22
pt: Nocivo: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada por inalação e ingestão, R48/20/22
sk: Škodlivý \, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou vdýchnutím a po požití, R48/20/22
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega vdihavanja in zauživanja, R48/20/22
sv: Farligt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom inandning och förtäring, R48/20/22

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Berührung mit der Haut, R48/21
en: Harmful: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure in contact with skin, R48/21
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici stykem s kůží, R48/21
dk: Farlig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved hudkontakt, R48/21
el: Επιβλαβές: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρα- τεταµένη έκθεση σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R48/21
es: Nocivo: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por contacto con la piel, R48/21
et: Kahjulik: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel kokkupuutel nahaga, R48/21
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle joutuessaan iholle, R48/21
fr: Nocif: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par contact avec la peau, R48/21
hu: Hosszabb időn át bőrrel érintkezve ártalmas: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/21
it: Nocivo: pericolo di gravi danni alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata a contatto con la pelle, R48/21
lt: Kenksminga: ilgą laiką pakartotinai veikiant per odą sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/21
lv: Kaitīgs – iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas saskares ar ādu, R48/21
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni għat-tul waqt li jmiss il-ġilda, R48/21
nl: Schadelijk: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij aanraking met de huid, R48/21
no: Helseskadelig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved hudkontakt, R48/21
pl: Działa szkodliwie w kontakcie ze skórą; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/21
pt: Nocivo: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada em contacto com a pele, R48/21
sk: Škodlivý \, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou pri kontakte s pokožkou, R48/21
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega stika s kožo, R48/21
sv: Farligt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom hudkontakt, R48/21

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Berührung mit der Haut und durch Verschlucken, R48/21/22
en: Harmful: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure in contact with skin and if swallowed, R48/21/22
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici stykem s kůží a požíváním, R48/21/22
dk: Farlig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved hudkontakt og indtagelse, R48/21/22
el: Επιβλαβές: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρα- τεταµένη έκθεση σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R48/21/22
es: Nocivo: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por contacto con la piel e ingestión, R48/21/22
et: Kahjulik: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R48/21/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R48/21/22
fr: Nocif: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R48/21/22
hu: Hosszabb időn át bőrrel érintkezve és szájon át a szervezetbe jutva ártalmas: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/21/22
it: Nocivo: pericolo di gravi danni alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R48/21/22
lt: Kenksminga: ilgą laiką pakartotinai veikiant per odą ir praryjant sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/21/22
lv: Kaitīgs – iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas saskares ar ādu un norijot, R48/21/22
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni għat-tul meta jmiss il-ġilda u jekk jinbela', R48/21/22
nl: Schadelijk: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij inademing\, aanraking met de huid en opname door de mond, R48/21/22
no: Helseskadelig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved hudkontakt og svelging, R48/21/22
pl: Działa szkodliwie w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/21/22
pt: Nocivo: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R48/21/22
sk: Škodlivý \, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R48/21/22
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega stika s kožo in zauživanja, R48/21/22
sv: Farligt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom hudkontakt och förtäring, R48/21/22

de: Gesundheitsschädlich: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Verschlucken, R48/22
en: Harmful: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure if swallowed, R48/22
cs: Zdraví škodlivý : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici požíváním, R48/22
dk: Farlig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved indtagelse, R48/22
el: Επιβλαβές: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρα- τεταµένη έκθεση σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R48/22
es: Nocivo: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por ingestión, R48/22
et: Kahjulik: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel allaneelamisel, R48/22
fi: Terveydelle haitallista: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle nieltynä, R48/22
fr: Nocif: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par ingestion, R48/22
hu: Szájon keresztül hosszabb időn át a szervezetbe jutva ártalmas: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/22
it: Nocivo: pericolo di gravi danni alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata per ingestione, R48/22
lt: Kenksminga: ilgą laiką pakartotinai praryjant sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/22
lv: Kaitīgs – norijot iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas iedarbības, R48/22
mt: Jagħmel ħsara: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni għat-tul jekk jinbela', R48/22
nl: Schadelijk: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij opname door de mond, R48/22
no: Helseskadelig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved svelging, R48/22
pl: Działa szkodliwie po połknięciu; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/22
pt: Nocivo: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada por ingestão, R48/22
sk: Škodlivý \, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou po požití, R48/22
sl: Zdravju škodljivo: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega zauživanja, R48/22
sv: Farligt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom förtäring, R48/22

de: Giftig: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Einatmen, R48/23
en: Toxic: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure through inhalation, R48/23
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici vdechováním, R48/23
dk: Giftig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved indånding, R48/23
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρατε- ταµένη έκθεση όταν εισπνέεται, R48/23
es: Tóxico: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por inhalación, R48/23
et: Mürgine: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel sissehingamisel, R48/23
fi: Myrkyllistä: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle hengitettynä, R48/23
fr: Toxique: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par inhalation, R48/23
hu: Hosszabb időn át belélegezve mérgező: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/23
it: Tossico: pericolo di gravi danni alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata per inalazione, R48/23
lt: Toksiška: ilgą laiką pakartotinai įkvepiant sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/23
lv: Toksisks – iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas iedarbības ieelpojot, R48/23
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni ghat- tul minħabba xamm, R48/23
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij inademing, R48/23
no: Giftig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved innånding, R48/23
pl: Działa toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/23
pt: Tóxico: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada por inalação, R48/23
sk: Jedovatý \, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou vdýchnutím, R48/23
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega vdihavanja, R48/23
sv: Giftigt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom inandning, R48/23

de: Giftig: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Einatmen und durch Berührung mit der Haut, R48/23/24
en: Toxic: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure through inhalation and in contact with skin, R48/23/24
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici vdechováním a stykem s kůží, R48/23/24
dk: Giftig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved indånding og hudkontakt, R48/23/24
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρατε- ταµένη έκθεση όταν εισπνέεται και σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R48/23/24
es: Tóxico: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por inhalación y contacto con la piel, R48/23/24
et: Mürgine: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel sissehingamisel ja kokkupuutel nahaga, R48/23/24
fi: Myrkyllistä: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle hengitettynä ja joutuessaan iholle, R48/23/24
fr: Toxique: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par inhalation et par contact avec la peau, R48/23/24
hu: Hosszabb időn át belélegezve és bőrrel érintkezve mérgező: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/23/24
it: Tossico: pericolo di gravi danni alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata per inalazione e a contatto con la pelle, R48/23/24
lt: Toksiška: ilgą laiką pakartotinai įkvepiant ir veikiant per odą sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/23/24
lv: Toksisks – iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas iedarbības ieelpojot un nonākot saskarē ar ādu, R48/23/24
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni ghat- tul minħabba xamm u mess mal-ġilda, R48/23/24
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij inademing en aanraking met de huid, R48/23/24
no: Giftig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved innånding og hudkontakt, R48/23/24
pl: Działa toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe i w kontakcie ze skórą; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/23/24
pt: Tóxico: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada por inalação e em contacto com a pele, R48/23/24
sk: Jedovatý \, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou vdýchnutím a pri kontakte s pokožkou, R48/23/24
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega vdihavanja in stika s kožo, R48/23/24
sv: Giftigt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom inandning och hudkontakt, R48/23/24